Washington statutes.
RCW 18.19.190

Other professions not affected.

This chapter shall not be construed as permitting the administration or prescription of drugs or in any way infringing upon the practice of medicine and surgery as defined in chapter 18.71 RCW, or in any way infringing upon the practice of psychology as defined in chapter 18.83 RCW, or restricting the scope of the practice of counseling for those registered under this chapter.

[ 2001 c 251 s 25; 1987 c 512 s 18.]

NOTES:

Severability—2001 c 251: See RCW 18.225.900.